ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/nn_NO/hyph_nn_NO.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.aggregat9tilstand./tt=,8,1
.a2gg
.ag1gr
.aggre1ga
.aggregat1ti
.aggregat3ti2ls
.aggregattil1s2t
.aggregat9tilstandan2e./tt=,8,1
.aggregattilstan1da
.aggregattilstanda1ne
.aggregat9tilstanda2r./tt=,8,1
.aleman9nara2r./nn=,6,1
.a1le
.ale1ma
.aleman3na
.alemanna1ra
.alemannarar2
.alkohol9lo1v2a./ll=,7,1
.al1k
.alko1h
.alkohollo2
.alkohollov1
.alkohollo1va
.alkohol9love2n./ll=,7,1
.alkoholl1ove
.alkohollo1ven
.al9lend2e./ll=,2,1
.al1le
.allen1de
.allmen9nytti2g./nn=,6,1
.all1me
.allmennyt1ti
.allmen9nyttig2e./nn=,6,1
.allmennytti1ge
.amatør9radioklubbe2n./rr=,6,1
.a1ma
.ama1tø
.amatør1r
.amatørra1di
.amatørradi1ok
.amatørradio1kl
.amatørradio1klu
.amatørradioklu2b
.amatørradioklu2b1b
.amatørradioklub3ben
.amatør9radiokode2n./rr=,6,1
.amatørradio1ko
.amatørradioko1de
.amatør9rekkje2r./rr=,6,1
.amatør3re
.amatørrek1kj
.amatør9revyan2e./rr=,6,1
.amatørre1vy1
.amatørrevy1an
.amatørrevya1ne
.amatør9rockeband./rr=,6,1
.amatørroc1ke
.amatørrocke1b
.arrondis9semen2t./ss=,8,1
.ar1r
.arrondi4s
.arron1di
.arrondis1se
.arrondisse1me
.automat9teori./tt=,7,1
.au1to
.auto1ma
.automat3te
.automat3te1or
.automatteo1ri
.av1
.avskrek9kin2g./kk=,7,1
.a2vs
.av1skr
.avskre2k
.avskrek1ki
.bajonet9tan2e./tt=,7,1
.1b
.bajon2
.bajo1ne
.bajonet1ta
.bajonetta1ne
.bal9leika2r./ll=,3,1
.bal1le
.ballei1ka
.bambus9sko2g./ss=,6,1
.1bam1b
.bambus9skoga2r./ss=,6,1
.bambussko1ga
.bambus9sko2t./ss=,6,1
.bambus1skot
.bevis9system./ss=,5,1
.be1v
.be1vi
.bevis1sy
.bevissys1
.bevissys1te
.bibel9lær2a./ll=,5,1
.1bi1b
.bibellæ1ra
.bibliotekar9ret1t2a./rr=,11,1
.bibli1o
.biblio1t
.bibli1o1te
.bibliote1ka
.bibliotekarre4
.bibliotekar1r
.bibliotekarret1ta
.birgit9tinaran2e./tt=,6,1
.bi2rg
.bir1gi
.birgit1ti
.birgitti1na
.birgittina1ra
.birgittinara1ne
.biskop9palas2s./pp=,6,1
.biskop1pa
.biskop2p1al
.biskoppa1la
.blod9dopin2g./dd=,4,1
.blo2dd
.blod1do
.bloddo1pi
.bonus9songa2r./ss=,5,1
.bo1nu
.bonus1so
.bonus1son
.bonusson1ga
.bonus9spo2r./ss=,5,1
.bren9nedale2n./nn=,4,1
.brenne1d
.bren1ne
.brenne1da
.brenneda1le
.brukar9rettleiin2g./rr=,6,1
.bru1ka
.brukarre4
.brukar1r
.brukarrett1l
.brukarrettlei1i
.bus9sel1ska2p./ss=,3,1
.bus1se
.busse2ls
.bussels2k
.bussel1ska
.bus9selskap2a./ss=,3,1
.bussel1ska1pa
.bus9selskape2t./ss=,3,1
.busselska1pe
.bus9sjåfø2r./ss=,3,1
.bus1sj
.bussjå1f
.bus9sjåføran2e./ss=,3,1
.bussjåfø1ra
.bussjåføra1ne
.bus9sjåføre2n./ss=,3,1
.bussjåfø1re
.bus9stop2p./ss=,3,1
.bus1s2t
.bus9stoppe2t./ss=,3,1
.busstop1pe
.byg9gry2n./gg=,3,1
.by2gg
.byg1gr
.d2
.depres9siv2e./ss=,6,1
.1de
.de1p
.de1pr
.dep2ress
.depres1si
.depressi1ve
.dilet9tan2t./tt=,5,1
.1di
.di1le
.dilet1ta
.dressur9ridin2g./rr=,7,1
.d2ress
.dres1su
.dressur1r
.dressurri1di
.e2
.eit9ta2l./tt=,3,1
.eit1ta
.ekspres9siv2e./ss=,7,1
.1ek1s2p
.e2ks
.eksp2ress
.ekspres1si
.ekspressi1ve
.fallos9symbo2l./ss=,6,1
.1fa
.fallo2
.fallos1sy
.fallossym1b
.fallossym3bol
.favorit9tan2e./tt=,7,1
.2fav
.fa1vo
.favo1ri
.favorit1ta
.favoritta1ne
.filmmusikkar9rangøre2n./rr=,12,1
.1fi
.film1m
.film1mus
.filmmu1si
.filmmusik1ka
.filmmusikkar1r
.filmmusikkarran1gør
.filmmusikkarrangø1re
.fiskeoppdret9tara2r./tt=,12,1
.3fis1ke
.fiske1o
.fiske1op
.fiskeop2p1d
.fiskeoppdret1ta
.fiskeoppdretta1ra
.fiskeoppdrettarar2
.fjel9land./ll=,4,1
.1fj
.fjel1la
.fjel9lande2t./ll=,4,1
.fjellan1de
.fjelland2et
.fjel9landskape2t./ll=,4,1
.fjel2lands
.fjelland3ska1pe
.fjel9lengen2e./ll=,4,1
.fjel1le
.fjellen1ge
.fjellen3ge1ne
.fjel9lenge2r./ll=,4,1
.fjel9luf1t2a./ll=,4,1
.fjel1lu
.fjel1lu2f
.fjellu2ft
.fjelluf1ta
.flus9syr2a./ss=,4,1
.1fl
.flus1sy
.flussy1ra
.flus9syr2e./ss=,4,1
.flussy1re
.forgub9bin2g./bb=,6,1
.for2gu
.fo2rg
.forgu2b
.forgu2b1b
.formful9lend2e./ll=,7,1
.form1f
.form1fu
.formfull3end
.formful1le
.formfullen1de
.forseg9gjort2e./gg=,6,1
.fo2r1s
.for1se
.forse2gg
.forseg1gj
.forseggjor1te
.fotbal9la3g2a./ll=,6,1
.fot1b
.fotbal1la
.fotballa1ga
.fotball9eia2r./ll=,7,1
.fotbal1le
.fotballei1ar
.framkal9la2s2t./ll=,7,1
.fra2m
.fram1k
.framkal1la
.frankar9rike2t./rr=,7,1
.fran1ka
.frankar1r
.frankarri1ke
.fregat9tan2e./tt=,6,1
.fre1ga
.fregat1ta
.fregatta1ne
.ful2
.ful9las1t2a./ll=,3,1
.1fu
.ful1la
.fullas1ta
.g2
.gas9sveisin2g./ss=,3,1
.1ga
.gas2s1ve
.gassvei1si
.general9løytnan2t./ll=,7,1
.1ge
.3ge1ne
.gene1ra
.general1lø
.generalløy1
.generalløyt2na
.generalløyt1n
.general9løytnanta2r./ll=,7,1
.generalløytnan1ta
.gigawat9ti3m2e./tt=,7,1
.1gi
.gi1ga
.giga1w
.giga1wa
.gigawat1ti
.gigawat1ti1me
.gitarak9kordan2e./kk=,7,1
.gi1ta
.gita1ra
.gitarak1ko
.gitarakkor3dan
.gitarakkor1da
.gitarakkorda1ne
.grafik9kor1t2a./kk=,6,1
.1gr
.gra1fi
.grafik2ko
.grafik3kort
.grafikkor1ta
.granit9tåre2r./tt=,6,1
.gra1ni
.granitt1å
.granit3tå1re
.grensekrys9sand2e./ss=,10,1
.gren1se
.grense1kr
.grensekrys1sa
.grensekrys1sand
.grensekryssan1de
.grunnleg9ga2s2t./gg=,8,1
.grunn1l
.grunn1leg
.grunnle2gg
.grunnleg1ga
.grunnvas9spegele2n./ss=,8,1
.grunn1v
.grunnvass1p
.grunnvasspe1ge
.grunnvasspege1le
.gul9lakse2n./ll=,3,1
.1gu
.gul1la
.gulla2k1s
.gullak1se
.gul9land./ll=,3,1
.gullfavorit9tan2e./tt=,11,1
.gull1f
.gull1fa
.gull2fav
.gullfa1vo
.gullfavo1ri
.gullfavorit1ta
.gullfavoritta1ne
.gul9likse2n./ll=,3,1
.gul1li
.gulli2ks
.gullik1se
.hal9land./ll=,3,1
.1h
.hal1la
.handbal9la2g./ll=,7,1
.hand1b
.handbal1la
.handbal9la3g2a./ll=,7,1
.handballa1ga
.handbal9lage2t./ll=,7,1
.handballa1ge
.hel9landsvi2k./ll=,3,1
.hel1la
.hel2lands
.hellands1v
.hel9lesne2s./ll=,3,1
.hel1le
.helles3nes
.helles1ne
.herskar9ringe2n./rr=,7,1
.her1s2k
.he2rs
.her1s4ka
.herskar1r
.herskarrin1ge
.hof9fol2k./ff=,3,1
.hof1fo
.hoffol1k
.hof9folk2a./ff=,3,1
.hovudkonkur9renta2r./rr=,11,1
.ho1vu
.hovud1
.hovud1k
.hovudkon1k
.hovudkon1ku
.hovudkonkur3re
.hovudkonkur1r
.hovudkonkurren1ta
.hybel9li2v./ll=,5,1
.hy1b
.hybel1li
.i2
.ideal9land./ll=,5,1
.i1de
.ide1a
.ideal1la
.ideal9lande2t./ll=,5,1
.ideallan1de
.idealland2et
.ideal9løysin3g2a./ll=,5,1
.ideal1lø
.idealløy1
.idealløy1si
.idealløysin1ga
.indianar9reserva2t./rr=,8,1
.in1di
.indi1an
.india1na
.indianarre4
.indianar1r
.indianarre1se
.indianarreser1v
.indianar9reservate2t./rr=,8,1
.indianarreserva1te
.israelit9tan2e./tt=,8,1
.is1r
.isra1e
.israe1li
.israelit1ta
.israelitta1ne
.jazzbal9let2t./ll=,7,1
.jazz1b
.jazzbal1le
.jus9skulan2e./ss=,3,1
.1jus1
.jussku1la
.jusskula1ne
.justis9samarbeid./ss=,6,1
.jus1tis
.justis1sa
.justis1sam
.justissa2mar
.justissa1ma
.justissam1ar1b
.justis9sekretæ2r./ss=,6,1
.justis1se
.justisse1kr
.justissekre1tæ
.k2
.kabel9lengd./ll=,5,1
.kabe2l
.ka1b
.kabel1le
.kabellen2gd
.kabel9lengde2r./ll=,5,1
.kabelleng1de
.kabel9leverandøre2n./ll=,5,1
.kabelle1ve
.kabelleve1ra
.kabelleve3rand
.kabelleveran1dør
.kabelleverandø1re
.kandis9sukke2r./ss=,6,1
.kandi4s
.kan1di
.kandis1su
.kandissuk1ke
.karmelit9tan2e./tt=,8,1
.kar1me
.karme1li
.karmelit1ta
.karmelitta1ne
.kasus9språ2k./ss=,5,1
.1kas
.ka1su
.ka1sus
.kasus1språ
.kasus9suffik2s./ss=,5,1
.kasus3su
.kasussu2f
.kasussuf1fi
.kasussuffi2ks
.kasus9suffikse2t./ss=,5,1
.kasussuffik1se
.kasus9system./ss=,5,1
.kasus1sy
.kasussys1
.kasussys1te
.kasus9system2a./ss=,5,1
.kasussyste1ma
.kasus9syste3me2t./ss=,5,1
.kasussyste1me
.kausal9lova2r./ll=,6,1
.kaus2
.kau1sa
.kausallo2
.kausallov1
.kausallo1va
.kilowat9ti3ma2r./tt=,7,1
.ki1lo
.kilo1wa
.kilowat1ti
.kilowat1ti1ma
.kilowat9ti3m2e./tt=,7,1
.kilowat1ti1me
.kjendis9statu2s./ss=,7,1
.kjendi4s
.kjen1di
.kjendiss2t
.kjendis1sta
.kjendissta1tu
.kjendissta1tus
.kjendis9statuse2n./ss=,7,1
.kjendisstatu1se
.klarinet9tan2e./tt=,8,1
.kla1ri
.klari1ne
.klarinet1ta
.klarinetta1ne
.klarinet9ti2s2t./tt=,8,1
.klarinet1ti
.klarinet1ti2s
.klarinet9tiste2n./tt=,8,1
.klarinettis1te
.klimaforskarkal9la2s2t./ll=,15,1
.kli1ma
.klima1fo
.klimafo2r1s
.klimafors2k
.klimafor1s4ka
.klimaforskar1ka
.klimaforskarkal1la
.kol9lega2r./ll=,3,1
.kol1le
.kol1leg
.kolle1ga
.kolos9sal2t./ss=,5,1
.ko1lo
.kolos1sa
.kommis9sæ1ra2r./ss=,6,1
.3kom
.kom1m
.kom1mi
.kommis1sæ
.kommissær1
.kommunikasjonssatellit9tan2e./tt=,22,1
.kommu1ni
.kommuni1ka
.kommuni1kas
.kommunika1sj
.kommunikasjon2
.kommunikasjons1s
.kommunikasjons1sa
.kommunikasjonssa1te
.kommunikasjonssatel1li
.kommunikasjonssatellit1ta
.kommunikasjonssatellitta1ne
.kompas9snål2a./ss=,6,1
.kom1p
.kompass1nål
.kompassnå1la
.komplet9ter2t./tt=,7,1
.komplet1te
.komplet3tert
.konkur9renta2r./rr=,6,1
.kon1k
.kon1ku
.konkur3re
.konkur1r
.konkurren1ta
.kornet9ti2s2t./tt=,6,1
.kor1ne
.kornet1ti
.kornet1ti2s
.kornet9tiste2n./tt=,6,1
.kornettis1te
.kritikar9ro3s2a./rr=,8,1
.kri3ti
.kriti1ka
.kritikar1r
.kritikar9ro2s2t./rr=,8,1
.kritikar9rost2e./rr=,8,1
.kritikarros1te
.kritikar9røystin2g./rr=,8,1
.kritikarrøys1ti
.krys9stil2t./ss=,4,1
.krys1s2t
.krys1stilt
.kvadrat9tom3ma2r./tt=,7,1
.kva1d
.kva1dra
.kvadratt1o
.kvadrattom1m
.kvadrattom1ma
.kvadrat9tom3m2e./tt=,7,1
.kvadrattom1me
.kystfiskar9romanan2e./rr=,10,1
.3kys
.kyst1f
.kyst1fi
.kystfis1kar
.kystfiskar1r
.kystfiskarro1ma
.kystfiskarroma3na
.kystfiskarromana1ne
.l2
.lækjarat9te2s4t./tt=,8,1
.læ1k
.lækja1ra
.lækjarat3te
.leikar9rin2g./rr=,6,1
.lei1ka
.leikar1r
.leikar9ringan2e./rr=,6,1
.leikarr4in1ga
.leikarringa1ne
.leikar9ringa2r./rr=,6,1
.leikar9ringe2n./rr=,6,1
.leikarrin1ge
.lekamleg9gjerin3g2a./gg=,8,1
.le1ka
.lekam1l
.lekam1leg
.lekamle2gg
.lekamleg1gj
.lekamleggje1ri
.lekamleggjer4in1ga
.let9ten2t./tt=,3,1
.let1te
.lod9drettståand2e./dd=,3,1
.lo2dd
.lodd1r
.loddrett1s2t
.loddrett3stå1a
.loddrettståan1de
.lokalkasus9system./ss=,10,1
.lo3ka
.lokal1k
.lokal1kas
.lokalka1su
.lokalka1sus
.lokalkasus1sy
.lokalkasussys1
.lokalkasussys1te
.lokal9la3g2a./ll=,5,1
.lokal1la
.lokalla1ga
.lokal9lage2t./ll=,5,1
.lokalla1ge
.lokal9lagsleia2r./ll=,5,1
.lokallags1l
.lokallagslei1ar
.lokal9lagsmøt2e./ll=,5,1
.lokallags1m
.lokallags1møt
.lokallagsmø1te
.lokal9leiara2r./ll=,5,1
.lokal1le
.lokallei1ar
.lokalleia1ra
.lokalleiarar2
.lokal9list2e./ll=,5,1
.lokal1li
.lokallis1te
.manus9skrifte2t./ss=,5,1
.1ma
.ma1nu
.manusskri2ft
.manusskrif1te
.material9lær2e./ll=,8,1
.ma1te
.mate1ri
.materi1al
.materiallæ1re
.me2dal
.medaljefavorit9tan2e./tt=,14,1
.1me
.me1da
.medal1j
.medalje1fa
.medalje2fav
.medaljefa1vo
.medaljefavo1ri
.medaljefavorit1ta
.medaljefavoritta1ne
.mellomalderbal9lada2r./ll=,14,1
.mel3lo2
.mel1lom
.mellom1al
.mello1ma
.mellomal1de
.mellomalder1b
.mellomalderbal1la
.mellomalderballa1da
.merit9tan2e./tt=,5,1
.me1ri
.merit1ta
.meritta1ne
.metal9lop1p2e./ll=,5,1
.me1ta
.metallo2
.metal2lop
.metallop1pe
.meteorit9tan2e./tt=,8,1
.me1te
.me3te1or
.meteo1ri
.meteorit1ta
.meteoritta1ne
.metropolit9tan2e./tt=,10,1
.me1tr
.metro1po
.metropo1li
.metropolit1ta
.metropolitta1ne
.militærap9para2t./pp=,9,1
.1mi
.mi1li
.mili1tæ
.militærap1pa
.militærappa1ra
.minus9sid2a./ss=,5,1
.mi1nu
.minus1si
.minussi1da
.mistenkeleg9gjerin2g./gg=,11,1
.mis1te
.misten1ke
.mistenke1le
.mistenke1leg
.mistenkele2gg
.mistenkeleg1gj
.mistenkeleggje1ri
.møbel9lage2r./ll=,5,1
.møbe2
.mø1b
.møbel1la
.møbella1ge
.monolit9tan2e./tt=,7,1
.1mo
.mo1no
.mo1nol
.monolit1ta
.monolitta1ne
.monsun9nedbøre2n./nn=,6,1
.mon1s
.monsunne1d
.monsun1ne
.monsunned1b
.monsunnedbø1re
.moral9lær2a./ll=,5,1
.mo1ra
.morallæ1ra
.moral9lær2e./ll=,5,1
.morallæ1re
.moral9loven2e./ll=,5,1
.morallo2
.morallov1
.morall1ove
.morallo1ven
.morallove1ne
.mudderap9para2t./pp=,8,1
.mu1d
.mu2dd
.mud1de
.mudde1ra
.mudderap1pa
.mudderappa1ra
.musikkar9rangøre2n./rr=,8,1
.1mus
.mu1si
.musik1ka
.musikkar1r
.musikkarran1gør
.musikkarrangø1re
